Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 23. Virginia Electric Utility Regulation Act.
” was substituted for “ § 45.1-361.1” in subdivision A 6 and “ §

45.2-1706.1

” was substituted for “ § 67-101.1” in subsection D to conform to the recodification of

Titles 45.1
and 67 by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 476 deleted the last sentence in subdivision A 3, which read: “By the same date, each such utility shall also file its plan for its projected generation and transmission requirements to serve its native load for the next 10 years,
including how the utility will obtain such resources, the capital requirements for providing such resources, and the anticipated sources of funding for such resources.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 824, in subdivision A 5 b, deleted “of providing incentives” preceding “for the utility,” substituted “peak-shaving” for “demand management, conservation, energy efficiency, and load management” and deleted “and that the need
for the incentives is demonstrated with reasonable certainty” following “in the public interest”; added subdivision A 5 c; and redesignated former subdivisions A 5 c and A 5 d as subdivisions A 5 d and A 5 e, respectively.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 236, in subdivisions A 3 and A 9 and in subsection B, deleted “(20 VAC 5-200-30)” following “rules governing utility rate increase applications”; and added the last sentence in subsection D.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 367 and 382 are identical, and substituted “eight months after the date of filing” for nine months after the end of the test period” in the last paragraph of subdivision A 8. Acts 2011, c. 367, cl. 2 made the amendments effective
March 22, 2011.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 371 and 380 are identical, and deleted “(20 VAC 5-200-30)” following “utility rate increase applications” in the first sentence of subdivision A 3; in subdivision A 6, inserted “Coalbed methane gas powered 150 Between 5 and
15 years” in the table following the first paragraph and added the third paragraph; and deleted “(20 VAC 5-200-30)” following “utility rate increase applications” in clause (iv) of the last paragraph of subdivision A 9 and in subsection
B.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 435, in subdivision A 6, substituted “Renewable powered, other than landfill gas powered” for “Renewable powered” and inserted “Landfill gas powered 200 Between 5 and 15 years” in the table following the first paragraph, and in
the third paragraph, inserted the (a) designator and clause (b) and the sentence following; and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 2, effective February 14, 2013, rewrote subdivisions A 2, A 6, and A 8; in subdivision A 3, substituted “subdivision 5” for “subdivision 4 or 5” in the third sentence and added the fifth sentence; deleted the former third and
fourth sentences of the first paragraph of subdivision A 5 e, which read: “If the Commission determines it would be just, reasonable, and in the public interest, the Commission may include the enhanced rate of return on common equity
prescribed in subdivision 6 in a rate adjustment clause approved hereunder for a project whose purpose is to reduce the need for construction of new generation facilities by enabling the continued operation of existing generation facilities.
In the event the Commission includes such enhanced return in such rate adjustment clause, the project that is the subject of such clause shall be treated as a facility described in subdivision 6 for the purposes of this section”; substituted
“its generation and distribution services or, for any test period commencing after December 31, 2012, for a Phase II Utility and after December 31, 2013, for a Phase I Utility, more than 70 basis points below a fair combined rate of
return on” for “both” and inserted “or, for any test period commencing after December 31, 2012, for a Phase II Utility and after December 31, 2013, for a Phase I Utility, that 70 percent of the amount of such earnings that were more
than 70 basis points,” in the first sentence of subdivision A 9; and substituted “subdivision A 2” for “subdivision A” at the end of the first sentence of subsection B. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 212 substituted “clause (i) of subdivision 8” for “clause (i) of subdivision A 8” in subdivision A 2 g; substituted “subdivision 2” for “subdivision A 2 of this section” in subdivision A 5 c; rewrote the first paragraph in subdivision
A 6; in the present eighth paragraph of subdivision A 6, substituted “Neither generation facilities described in clause (ii) that utilize simple-cycle combustion turbines nor new underground facilities shall receive” for “Generation
facilities described in clause (ii) that utilize simple-cycle combustion turbines shall not receive” in the first sentence and added the second and third sentences; substituted “(1)” for “(a)” and “(2)” for “(b)” in the fourth paragraph
of subdivision A 6; in subdivision A 7, substituted “subdivision 5 a, or that are related to facilities and projects described in clause (i) of subdivision 6, or that are related to new underground facilities described in clause (iv)
of subdivision 6” for “clause (a) of subdivision 5, or that are related to facilities and projects described in clause (i) of subdivision 6” and substituted “subdivision 4, 5, or 6” for “subdivisions 4, 5, or 6”; substituted “subdivision
8 a or 8 c” for “clause (i) or (iii) ” in the first paragraph of subdivision A 8; redesignated subdivisions A 8 (i) through (iii) as subdivisions 8 a through 8 c, respectively; and made related changes in subdivision A 8 c, A 9, and
A 10.

The 2014 amendment by c. 541 substituted “subdivision 8 a” for “clause (i) of subdivision A 8” in subdivision A 2 g; substituted “subdivision 7” for “subdivision A 7 of this section” in subdivision A 3; substituted “subdivision 2” for “subdivision A 2
of this section” in subdivision A 5 c; added the present fourth and fifth paragraphs in subdivision A 6; in the first paragraph of subdivision A 7, substituted “subdivision 5 a” for “clause (a) of subdivision 5” in the second sentences,
added “Except as provided in subdivision 6” in the third sentence, substituted “subdivision 4, 5, or 6” for “subdivisions 4, 5, or 6” in the fourth sentence, and added the last 6 sentences; substituted “subdivision 8 a or 8 c” for
“clause (i) or (iii) ” in the first paragraph of subdivision A 8; redesignated subdivisions A 8 (i) through (iii) as subdivisions 8 a through 8 c, respectively; and made related changes in subdivision A 8 c, A 9, and A 10.

The 2014 amendment by c. 548 substituted “clause (i) of subdivision 8” for “clause (i) of subdivision A 8” in subdivision A 2 g; substituted “subdivision 2” for “subdivision A 2 of this section” in subdivision A 5 c; rewrote the first paragraph in subdivision
A 6; in the present eighth paragraph of subdivision A 6, substituted “Neither generation facilities described in clause (ii) that utilize simple-cycle combustion turbines nor new underground facilities shall receive” for “Generation
facilities described in clause (ii) that utilize simple-cycle combustion turbines shall not receive” in the first sentence and added the second and third sentences; substituted “(1)” for “(a)” and “(2)” for “(b)” in the fourth paragraph
of subdivision A 6; in subdivision A 7, substituted “subdivision 5 a, or that are related to facilities and projects described in clause (i) of subdivision 6, or that are related to new underground facilities described in clause (iv)
of subdivision 6” for “clause (a) of subdivision 5, or that are related to facilities and projects described in clause (i) of subdivision 6” and substituted “subdivision 4, 5, or 6” for “subdivisions 4, 5, or 6”; substituted “subdivision
8 a or 8 c” for “clause (i) or (iii) ” in the first paragraph of subdivision A 8; redesignated subdivisions A 8 (i) through (iii) as subdivisions 8 a through 8 c, respectively; made related changes in subdivision A 8 c, A 9, and A
10; and substituted “The Commission may determine” for “Nothing in this section shall preclude the Commission from determining” in subsection D.

The 2014 amendment by c. 550 added the last two sentences in the third paragraph of subdivision A 6; added the present sixth and seventh paragraphs in subdivision A 6; and added “Except as provided in subdivision 6” in the third sentence of the first
paragraph of subdivision A 7.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 37, in subdivision A 3, twice substituted “each Phase I Utility” for “Phase I utilities” and substituted “each Phase II Utility” for “Phase II utilities”; added subdivision A 5 f; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendment by c. 599 rewrote the first and fifth paragraphs in subdivision A 6.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 3, effective February 12, 2016, in subdivision A 6, substituted “A utility that constructs any such facility, or purchases any facility” for “A utility that constructs or purchases any such generation facility” in the fourth sentence.
For applicability, see Editor’s note.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 246, in subdivision A 6, inserted “or (v) one or more pumped hydroelectricity generation and storage facilities that utilize on-site or off-site renewable energy resources as all or a portion of their power source and such facilities
and associated resources are located in the coalfield region of the Commonwealth as described in §

15.2-6002

, regardless of whether such facility is located within or without the utility’s service territory” in the first sentence and inserted “described in clauses (i) and (ii)” in the seventh sentence.

The 2017 amendment by c. 564, in subdivision A 6, in the first paragraph, inserted “including the costs of any system or equipment upgrade, system or equipment replacement, or other cost reasonably appropriate to extend the combined operating license
for or the operating life of one or more generation facilities utilizing nuclear power” in the first sentence, inserted “or makes modifications” near the beginning of the fourth sentence, inserted “described in clause (ii)” in the
seventh sentence, and inserted “constructed pursuant to clause (ii)” in the first and second paragraphs following the table; and inserted “or clause (iii)” in the third sentence of subdivision A 7.

The 2017 amendment by c. 583, in subdivision A 6, in the first paragraph, inserted the eighteenth and twentieth sentences and in the nineteenth sentence, inserted “such” and “that meet this criteria,” and deleted “and shall. give due consideration to
the public policy goals of increased electric service reliability and reduced outage times associated with the replacement of existing overhead distribution facilities with new underground facilities” at the end.

The 2017 amendment by c. 820, in subdivision A 6, added clause (v), made a related change, inserted “described in clause (i) or (ii)” in the seventh sentence, and inserted “or (v)” in the fifteenth sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 296 rewrote subsection A. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

The 2018 amendment by c. 795 added the last sentence in subdivision A 3; and inserted “excluding any debt associated with securitized bonds that are the obligation of non-Virginia jurisdictional customers” in the introductory language of subdivision A
10.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 535, expires December 31, 2023, and in subdivision A 4, added clause (iii) in the first sentence and “including costs incurred by the utility to construct, operate, and maintain transmission lines and substations installed in
order to provide service to a business park” in the second sentence; and made stylistic changes. For expiration of amendment, see Editor’s note above.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 741 and 773 are nearly identical, and in subdivision A 5 c, inserted the second, fourth, and fifth sentences; in subdivision A 5 f., in the second paragraph, inserted the first sentence, and inserted “other rate” preceding “adjustment
clause.” Subdivision A 5 c is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 799, in subdivision A 5 c, in the second paragraph (now the sixth paragraph), deleted the former first sentence, which read: “None of the costs of new energy efficiency programs of an electric utility, including recovery of revenue
reductions, shall be assigned to any large general service customer,” and in the second sentence, added “As used in this subdivision” and substituted “one megawatt of demand from a single site” for “500 kilowatts of demand from a single
meter of delivery,” inserted the third paragraph (now the seventh paragraph), added the first two sentences of the fourth paragraph (now the next to last paragraph), deleted “as defined by the Commission” following “large general service
customer” in the following sentence, and made stylistic changes. The amendments by Acts 2020, cc. 1193 and 1994 included the amendment by Acts 2020, c. 799 in nearly identical form, and have been set out above at the direction of the
Virginia Code Commission.

The 2020 amendment by c. 801 added subdivision A 5 g and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1108, in subdivision A 2 a, inserted “for applications received by the Commission on or after January 1, 2020,” “either (i)” and “or (ii) the authorized returns on common equity that are set by the applicable regulatory commissions
for the same selected peer group” and substituted “150 basis points” for “300 basis points”; and in subdivision A 2 b in the first sentence, inserted “for applications received by the Commission on or after January 1, 2020” and “or
authorized, as applicable” twice.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1190, in subdivision A 6 in the fifth (now fourth) paragraph after the table, inserted “Additionally, energy storage facilities with an aggregate capacity of 2,700 megawatts are in the public interest” and inserted “or energy
storage” in the last sentence.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1193 and 1194 are identical, and in subdivision A 5 b, added “or pilot programs” in the first sentence; rewrote subdivisions A 5 c and A 5d; in the first sentence of subdivision A 5 e, inserted “to mitigate impacts to marine
life caused by construction of offshore wind generating facilities, as described in § 56-585.1:11, or” and added “including the costs of allowances purchased through a market-based trading program for carbon dioxide emissions”; in
subdivision A 6, in the last sentence of the first paragraph, substituted “that emits carbon dioxide” for “described in clause (i) or (ii)” and inserted “already met the energy savings goals identified in § 56-596.2 and that the identified
need cannot be met more affordably through the deployment or utilization of demand-side resources or energy storage resources and that it has”, added the second through fifth sentences of the second paragraph, in the third paragraph,
fourth sentence from the end, substituted “16,100 megawatts” for “5,000 megawatts” and “100 megawatts” for “50 megawatts” and inserted “onshore”; at the beginning of the first paragraph following the table, deleted “For generating
facilities other than those utilizing nuclear power constructed pursuant to clause (ii) or those utilizing energy derived from offshore wind, as of July 1, 2013,” deleted the former first sentence of the second paragraph following
the table, deleted the former third paragraph following the table, which read: “In connection with planning to meet forecasted demand for electric generation supply and assure the adequate and sufficient reliability of service, consistent
with § 56-598, planning and development activities for a new nuclear generation facility or facilities are in the public interest,” and in the present fourth paragraph following the table, in the first sentence, added “Notwithstanding
any provision of Chapter 296 of the Acts of Assembly of 2018,” inserted “onshore,” substituted “16,100 megawatts” for “5,000 megawatts” and “100 megawatts” for “50 megawatts,” deleted “a new test or demonstration project for” following
“together with,” and substituted “3,000 megawatts” for “16 megawatts”; in subdivision A 8 a, added the first sentence, and in the second sentence added “If the Commission finds, for reasons other than revenue reductions related to
energy efficiency measures, that”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 327, effective July 1, 2021, in the last sentence of subsection D, substituted “Commonwealth Clean Energy Policy set forth in § 67-101.1” for “Commonwealth Energy Policy set forth in §§ 67-101 and 67-102.”

Law Review.

For comment, “My Two Cents Per Kilowatt-Hour: Virginia’s Renewable Energy Portfolio Standard,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 755 (2007).

For article, “Public Utility Law,” see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 295 (2008).